District of Columbia statutes.
22-1313

Kindling bonfires.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons within the limits of the District of Columbia to kindle or set on fire, or be present, aiding, consenting, or causing it to be done, in any street, avenue, road, or highway, alley, open ground, or lot, any box, barrel, straw, shavings, or other combustible, between the setting and rising of the sun; and, any person offending against the provisions of this section shall on conviction thereof, forfeit and pay a sum not exceeding $10 for each and every offense.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 14

Cross References

Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1113.
1973 Ed., § 22-1113.